Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1209
Patient, defined.

Patient means an individual who either identifies himself or herself as being in need of medical attention or upon assessment by an emergency care provider has an injury or illness requiring treatment.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 493;

Laws 2020, LB1002, § 24.